West Virginia, session 2026, HB4265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-20-6 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (registration forms and tags for registration, taxation, and control of dogs, 61 CSR 01B), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-5-1 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 18, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (grades and standards for apples, 61 CSR 08), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-1-4 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (public markets, 61 CSR 11), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-10B-9 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 18, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (licensing of livestock dealers, 61 CSR 11H), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-11E-8 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (Grade A pasteurized milk, 61 CSR 15), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-12E-7 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 4, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (select plant-based derivatives and select plant-based derivative products of hemp and kratom, 61 CSR 30), is authorized with the following amendments: On page 3, subsection 2.20. by striking out the words “2.0 percent and naturally derived” and inserting in lieu thereof the words “10 milligrams per dose”; On page 4, subsection 2.30. after the word “occurring” by inserting the word “and”; On page 11, subsection 8.13. by striking out the word “percentage” and inserting in lieu thereof the word “ milligram”; And, On page 14, paragraph 11.2.a.2., by striking out the words “2 percent and non-naturally occurring/synthetic products” and inserting in lieu thereof the words “10 milligrams per dose and non-naturally occurring and fully synthetic products.(g) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-36-1 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (agritourism, 61 CSR 37), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 6, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-11E-8 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 20, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (exempted dairy farms and milk and milk products processing, 61 CSR 40), is authorized. §64-9-2. Board of Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-12-1 of this code, modified by the Board of Architects to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 8, 2025, relating to the Board of Architects (registration of architects, 2 CSR 01), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-12-3 of this code, modified by the Board of Architects to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 8, 2025, relating to the Board of Architects (fees for registration of architects, 2 CSR 03), is authorized. §64-9-3. Attorney General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 5, 1985, authorized under the authority of §46A-6A-8 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (the establishment and qualification of third-party dispute mechanisms, 142 CSR 03), is authorized with the amendment set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.6. to read as follows:	"1.6. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036." The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 12, 1985, authorized under the authority of §61-11A-6 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (fair treatment of crime victims and witnesses, 142 CSR 04), is authorized with the amendment set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.5. to read as follows:	"1.5. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036." The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 4, 1987, authorized under the authority of §46A-6-103 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (the prevention of unfair or deceptive acts or practices in home improvement transactions, 142 CSR 05), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.10. to read as follows:	"1.10. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036." The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 14, 1987, authorized under the authority of §46A-6-103 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (the prevention of unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the sale of damaged goods or damaged products, 142 CSR 06), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.10. to read as follows:	"1.10. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036." The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 27, 1988, authorized under the authority of §47-14-9 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (administration of preneed burial contracts, 142 CSR 08), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.10. to read as follows:	"1.10. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036." §64-9-4. State Auditor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on February 7, 2025, authorized under the authority of §12-3-10 of this code, modified by the State Auditor to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 17, 2025, relating to the State Auditor (standards for requisitions for payment issued by the state officers on the Auditor, 155 CSR 01), is authorized with the following amendment:On page 8, by striking out the entirety of subsection 7.3. §64-9-5. Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 19, 2025, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (qualifications, training, examination, and certification of instructors in barbering, hair styling, nail technology, aesthetics, waxing, and cosmetology, 3 CSR 02), is authorized with the amendments.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 19, 2025, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (operational standards for schools of barbering, cosmetology, hair styling, nail technology, and aesthetics, 3 CSR 04), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 23, 2025, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (barber apprenticeship, 3 CSR 13), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (waxing specialists, 3 CSR 14), is authorized. §64-9-6. Contractor Licensing Board. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-42-5 of this code, relating to the Contractor Licensing Board (West Virginia Contractor Licensing Act, 28 CSR 02), is authorized. §64-9-7. Board of Examiners in Counseling. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-31-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners in Counseling to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Examiners in Counseling (licensing, 27 CSR 01), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 3, subsection 5.1., after the word “Board.” By adding the following: “Provided, That an individual covered by W. Va. Code §30-1-27 shall be subject only to the requirements for licensure found in W. Va. Code §30-1-27.” The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-31-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners in Counseling to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Examiners in Counseling (licensed professional counselor license renewal and continuing professional education requirements, 27 CSR 03), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-31-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners in Counseling to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Examiners in Counseling (marriage and family therapist licensing, 27 CSR 08), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 3, subsection 5.1., after the word “Board.” by adding the following:“Provided, That an individual covered by W. Va. Code §30-1-27 shall be subject only to the requirements for licensure found in W. Va. Code §30-1-27.” §64-9-9. Board of Funeral Service Examiners The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-6-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Funeral Service Examiners to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 10, 2025, relating to the Board of Funeral Service Examiners (funeral directors, embalmers, apprentices, courtesy card holders, and funeral establishment requirements, 6 CSR 01), is authorized. §64-9-10. Board of Landscape Architects. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-22-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Landscape Architects (fees, 9 CSR 03), is authorized. (b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, relating to the Board of Landscape Architects (application for waiver of initial licensing fees for certain individuals, 9 CSR 04), is authorized. §64-9-11. Board of Medicine. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-3E-3 of this code, relating to the Board of Medicine (licensure, practice requirements, disciplinary and complaint procedures, continuing education, physician assistants, 11 CSR 01B), is authorized.(b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-3-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Medicine (continuing education for physicians and podiatric physicians, 11 CSR 06), is authorized. §64-9-12. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-23-7 of this code, modified by the Medical Imaging Technologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 13, 2025, relating to the Medical Imaging Technologists (Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners, 18 CSR 01), is authorized.(b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-23-7 of this code, relating to the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners (continuing education, 18 CSR 02), is authorized.(c) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 16, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-23-7 of this code, modified by the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 13, 2025, relating to the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners (standards of ethics, 18 CSR 05), is authorized. §64-9-13. Municipal Pensions Oversight Board. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 9, 2024, authorized under the authority of §8-22-18a of this code, relating to the Municipal Pensions Oversight Board (exempt purchasing, 211 CSR 02), is authorized. §64-9-14. Board of Occupational Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-28-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Occupational Therapy (continuing education and competence, 13 CSR 04), is authorized. §64-9-15. Board of Optometry. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (the Board of Optometry, 14 CSR 01), is authorized.(b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (oral pharmaceutical certificate, 14 CSR 02), is authorized. (c) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (schedule of fees, 14 CSR 05), is authorized.(d) The legislative rule effective August 15, 2011, authorized under the authority of §30-8-1 of this code, relating to the Board of Optometry (interview evaluation, 14 CSR 06), is repealed.(e) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (licensure by reciprocity, 14 CSR 08), is authorized.(f) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (continuing education, 14 CSR 10), is authorized. §64-9-16. Board of Osteopathic Medicine. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-14-14 of this code, modified by the Board of Osteopathic Medicine to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 9, 2025, relating to the Board of Osteopathic Medicine (licensing procedures for osteopathic physicians, 24 CSR 01), is authorized.(b)  The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-14-14 of this code, modified by the Board of Osteopathic Medicine to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 9, 2025, relating to the Board of Osteopathic Medicine (osteopathic physician assistants, 24 CSR 02), is authorized.(c) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-14-14 of this code, relating to the Board of Osteopathic Medicine (emergency temporary permits to practice during States of Emergency or States of Preparedness, 24 CSR 09), is authorized. §64-9-17. Board of Pharmacy. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (licensure and practice of pharmacy, 15 CSR 01), is authorized.(b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (mail-order and non-resident pharmacies, 15 CSR 06), is authorized. (c) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-11a of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (registration of pharmacy technicians, 15 CSR 07), is authorized.(d) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (pharmacist recovery networks, 15 CSR 10), is authorized.(e) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (immunizations administered by pharmacists, pharmacy interns, and pharmacy technicians, 15 CSR 12), is authorized. (f) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (pharmacy permits, 15 CSR 15), is authorized.(g) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (pharmacists, 15 CSR 16), is authorized.(h) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (inspections, 15 CSR 19), is authorized. §64-9-18. Board of Physical Therapy. (a) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-20-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Physical Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Physical Therapy (general provisions for physical therapist and physical therapist assistant, 16 CSR 01), is authorized. (b) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-20A-2 of this code, modified by the Board of Physical Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Physical Therapy (general provisions for athletic trainers, 16 CSR 05), is authorized. §64-9-19. Psychologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-21-6 of this code, modified by the Psychologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 19, 2025, relating to the Psychologists (requirements for licensure as a psychologist or a school psychologist, 17 CSR 03), is authorized. §64-9-20. Public Service Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 12, 2025, authorized under the authority of §24-2E-3 of this code, relating to the Public Service Commission (the occupancy of customer-provided conduit, 150 CSR 37), is authorized. §64-9-21. Real Estate Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-40-8 of this code, modified by the Real Estate Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Real Estate Commission (licensing real estate brokers, associate brokers, and salespersons, and the conduct of brokerage business, 174 CSR 01), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 13, by striking out the entirety of subsection 16.4. §64-9-22. Secretary of State. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §3-1-48 of this code, relating to the Secretary of State (loan and grant programs under the Help America Vote Act for the purchase of voting equipment, election systems, software, services, and upgrades, 153 CSR 10), is authorized. §64-9-23. Senior Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 21, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-5S-9a of this code, relating to the Senior Services (shared table initiative for senior citizens, 76 CSR 06), is authorized. §64-9-24. Board of Social Work. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-30-6 of this code, relating to the Board of Social Work (fee schedule, 25 CSR 03), is authorized. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home